Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 2
COUNTY AND OTHER PUBLIC HIGHWAYS

43-2-201. Public highways.

The following are declared to be public highways:

All roads over private lands dedicated to the public use by deed to that effect, filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such roads are situate, when such dedication has been accepted by the board of county commissioners. A certificate of the county clerk and recorder with whom such deed is filed, showing the date of the dedication and the lands so dedicated, shall be filed with the county assessor of the county in which such roads are situate.

All roads over private or other lands dedicated to public uses by due process of law and not heretofore vacated by an order of the board of county commissioners duly entered of record in the proceedings of said board;

All roads over private lands that have been used adversely without interruption or objection on the part of the owners of such lands for twenty consecutive years;

All toll roads or portions thereof which may be purchased by the board of county commissioners of any county from the incorporators or charter holders thereof and thrown open to the public;

All roads over the public domain, whether agricultural or mineral.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 251, § 1.

G.S.

§ 2953.

L. 1891:

p. 302, § 1.

L. 1893:

p. 435, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5787.

L. 21:

p. 380, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1243.

CSA:

C. 143, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-1.

Cross references:

For toll roads, see part 3 of article 3 of this title 43.

43-2-201.1. Closure of public highways extending to public lands - penalty.

Any person, other than a governing body of a municipality or county acting pursuant to part 3 of this article 2, who intentionally blocks, obstructs, or closes any public highway, as described in section 43-2-201, that extends to any public land, including public land belonging to the federal government, thereby closing public access to public lands, without good cause therefor, commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to temporary and reasonable obstruction of the public highways described in subsection (1) of this section by a railroad train at a railroad crossing.

Any peace officer of this state, as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., has the authority to enforce the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, any owner of private land who complies with the provisions of this subsection (4) may post notice of intent to close a road crossing such land if such road has been abandoned. Said owner shall promptly notify the board of county commissioners of the county in which such road is located of such proposed closure. The board of county commissioners so notified shall publish notice of such proposed closure in a newspaper of general circulation in such county within sixty days after receipt of notice from said owner and shall post notice of such proposed closure at each end of the road described in the notice. If the board of county commissioners receives no objection to such proposed closure within eighteen months after such publication, the road described in such notice shall be closed to public access.

If the board of county commissioners receives objection to such proposed closure, it shall schedule a public hearing concerning the proposed closure and shall publish notice of said hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in such county at least ten days prior to said hearing. At said hearing, the board shall hear objections to the proposed closure and shall decide, within thirty days of the hearing, whether the road described in the notice shall be closed to public access.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire section added, p. 821, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1444, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1565, § 386, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1617, § 22, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3325, § 776, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

43-2-202. County road and bridge fund - apportionment to municipalities.

A fund to be known as the county road and bridge fund is created and established in each county of this state. Such fund shall consist of the revenue derived from the tax authorized to be levied under section 43-2-203 for road and bridge construction, maintenance, and administration, all moneys received by the county from the state or federal governments for expenditure on roads and bridges, and any other moneys that may become available to the county for such purpose. Any moneys that have become available to the county for expenditure on roads and bridges by virtue of a condition placed on any type of land use approval shall be accounted for separately and said expenditures shall be limited to roads and bridges in connection with such land use project.

In addition to the moneys specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the county road and bridge fund consists of any general fund moneys that the board of county commissioners of the applicable county transfers to the fund pursuant to section 30-25-106 (3), C.R.S., after the governor declares a disaster emergency in the county. The board of county commissioners may transfer back to the county general fund any moneys that it transferred to the county road and bridge fund pursuant to section 30-25-106 (3), C.R.S.

Each municipality located in any county of this state is entitled to receive from the county road and bridge fund of the county wherein it is located an amount equal to fifty percent of the revenue accruing to said fund from extension only of the levy authorized to be made under section 43-2-203 against the valuation for assessment of all taxable property located within its corporate boundaries; except that, by mutual agreement between such municipality and the board of county commissioners, such municipality may elect to receive, in part or in full, the equivalent of such amount in the value of materials furnished or work performed on roads and streets located within its corporate boundaries by the county either during the calendar year in which such revenue is actually collected or by mutual agreement during any succeeding calendar year. A board of county commissioners may, at its option, provide additional money, furnish additional materials, or perform additional work for a municipality located in the county in excess of the money or equivalent materials or work entitled to be received by such municipality under this section. If so determined by the division of local government as provided in section 29-1-301 (1.2)(b), C.R.S., this subsection (2) shall not apply to any one-time, nonrecurring expenditure as a result of an increased levy under section 29-1-301 (1.2), C.R.S., if the expenditure is for a county road or bridge capital project or county road or bridge capital asset.

In all cases where a municipality has not elected to receive its share of the county road and bridge fund in equivalent value of materials furnished or work performed by the county, under mutual agreement, it is the duty of the county treasurer, on the fifteenth day of each July, October, January, and April, to pay over to the treasurer of such municipality, out of the county road and bridge fund, the amount to which such municipality has become entitled during the preceding three calendar months.

All moneys received by a municipality from the county road and bridge fund shall be credited to an appropriate fund and shall be used by such municipality only for construction and maintenance of roads and streets located within its corporate boundaries.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 752, § 1.

CSA:

C. 143, § 9(1).

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-2.

L. 70:

p. 320, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 1230, § 1.

L. 75:

(2) amended, p. 1573, § 1, effective June 20.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 1204, § 2, effective April 29; (2) amended, p. 1201, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1262, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-007), ch. 3, p. 78, § 2, effective February 19.

43-2-203. County road and bridge budget - tax levy.

As a part of the total county budget and in conformity with the "Local Government Budget Law of Colorado", part 1 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., each county shall annually adopt a county road and bridge budget for the ensuing fiscal year, which budget shall show: The aggregate amount estimated to be expended for county road and bridge construction, maintenance, and administration and the aggregate amount estimated to be paid from the county road and bridge fund to municipalities located within the county, either in cash or in equivalent value of materials to be furnished or work to be performed under mutual agreements with such municipalities, during said fiscal year; the amount being carried over for equivalent materials to be furnished or work to be performed from any prior fiscal year for any municipality within the county pursuant to section 43-2-202 (2); the estimated balance in said fund at the beginning of said fiscal year; the aggregate amount estimated to be received from state, federal, or other sources during said fiscal year; and the amount necessary to be raised during said fiscal year from the levy authorized in subsection (2) of this section. The requirements of this subsection (1) do not apply to any moneys in the county road and bridge fund pursuant to section 30-25-106 (3), C.R.S.

The board of county commissioners in each county is authorized to levy such rate of tax on all taxable property located within the county as required, when added to the estimated balance on hand at the beginning of said ensuing fiscal year and the amount of all revenues, other than property tax revenue, estimated to be received during said fiscal year, to defray all expenditures and payments estimated to be made from the county road and bridge fund during said fiscal year. When determining the rate of tax to be levied pursuant to this subsection (2), the board of county commissioners shall exclude from the estimated balance of the county road and bridge fund any moneys that it transferred to the fund pursuant to section 30-25-106 (3), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 732, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 9(2).

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-3.

L. 70:

p. 321, § 2.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 1574, § 2, effective June 20.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-007), ch. 3, p. 79, § 3, effective February 19.

43-2-204. Commissioners authorized to acquire property for highways.

Boards of county commissioners, acting for their respective counties, are authorized to acquire by donation, by purchase, or by eminent domain proceedings in the name of such boards any private or public property necessary for the improvement or construction of state highways. Said boards have authority to contract with the department of transportation to pay for all or any part of such property so acquired.

Source:

L. 43:

p. 524, § 1.

CSA:

C. 143, § 63(1).

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-4.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1110, § 154, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For eminent domain proceedings, see articles 1 to 7 of title 38.

43-2-205. Rights-of-way - public land.

The board of county commissioners of each county in the state of Colorado is authorized to lease a right-of-way over any lands in the state of Colorado held for public purposes which are not in actual use for the purpose to which they are dedicated, for such period of time and under such terms and conditions as it deems advisable, and to construct and maintain public roads and highways thereon.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 382, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1311.

CSA:

C. 143, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-5.

43-2-206. Acquisition of rights of prior lessee.

If the board of county commissioners of any county, after entering into contract of lease of lands for highway purposes under the provisions of section 43-2-205, is unable to agree with the person holding possession under a prior lease, or otherwise, of any portion of the land so leased by the board of county commissioners for highway purposes for the purchase of the interest, title, or right to possession of any portion of the land necessary or required for the construction of the proposed highway on or over the strip of land so leased, such board may acquire the right to possession thereof in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of real estate.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 382, § 2.

C.L.

§ 1312.

CSA:

C. 143, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-6.

Cross references:

For condemnation proceedings, see articles 1 to 7 of title 38.

43-2-207. Expense of construction and maintenance.

The board of county commissioners of any county in the state of Colorado and the transportation commission of the state of Colorado are authorized to make such expenditures of moneys of the county and the state of Colorado appropriated to the construction and maintenance of highways upon lands leased or condemned for highway purposes under the provisions of section 43-2-205 as are necessary for the construction and the maintenance of public highways thereon.

Expenditures authorized under this title for the construction and maintenance of highways on land which has been purchased, condemned, leased, or otherwise acquired by the department of transportation or the board of county commissioners of any county of the state may include the spraying of such lands bordering highways which are infested with grasshoppers or other insects, as the latter are defined in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2), and may also include the destruction and eradication of noxious, injurious, and poisonous weeds growing along said highways.

Expenditures made by the transportation commission pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be paid from the state highway fund.

As used in this subsection (2), "insects" means any of the small invertebrate animals in the phylum arthropoda comprising the class insecta, arachnida, and chilopoda, that is six-legged winged and unwinged forms, eight-legged segmented forms and those with two or more pairs of legs per body segment.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 383, § 3.

C.L.

§ 1313.

CSA:

C. 143, § 66.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-7.

L. 58, 1st Ex. Sess.:

p. 30, §§ 1, 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-7.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1110, § 155, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1648, § 87, effective May 31.

Cross references:

For creation of state highway fund, see § 43-1-219; for provisions for reimbursement to state or county for spraying lands, see § 35-4-107.

43-2-208. County commissioners authorized to construct highways and let contracts.

Whenever any county highway or bridge is to be constructed or any grading or repairing is to be done upon any county highway, the board of county commissioners is authorized to undertake such construction, grading, or repairing in its own behalf or to let contracts for the same. Boards of county commissioners are also authorized to make bids and to enter into contracts, where the contract price involved does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars, with the department of transportation or any agency of the federal or state government for the construction, maintenance, and repair of state or federal highways or bridges within their respective counties and to undertake and perform whatever work is necessary in connection therewith. All labor employed in such contracts shall be bona fide residents of the state of Colorado, and in all cases preference shall be granted to residents of the county wherein the contract is being performed.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 33, Ex. Sess.:

p. 68, § 1.

CSA:

C. 143, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-8.

L. 86:

(2) repealed, p. 502, § 125, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1110, § 156, effective July 1.

43-2-209. Contract for work on highways - advertise for bids.

If any board of county commissioners desires to let out any work on the county highways by contract, it may advertise in a legal newspaper in the county or post a notice in the county courthouse, for a period of not less than ten days before the contract is let, for sealed proposals for performing the work. When a contract for work on highways involves expenditures equal to or greater than the amount at which a contract requires a contractor's bond under section 38-26-105, C.R.S., the board of county commissioners shall advertise in a newspaper as provided in this section unless such advertisement, in the judgment of the board, would be detrimental to the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. The advertisement must describe the work to be done and its location and must refer all persons to the person holding the plans and specifications therefor. and such contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, the board reserving the right to reject any bids proffered. The cost of any county highway work mentioned in sections 43-2-208 to 43-2-210 may be paid out of the county road and bridge fund or emergency road fund, as the board may determine.

Source:

L. 33, Ex. Sess.:

p. 69, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-9.

L. 73:

p. 1232, § 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1121), ch. 31, p. 180, § 1, effective March 14.

43-2-210. Only residents of county to be given employment.

Only those persons who, at the time of employment, are residents of the county in which the project is being carried on shall be given employment insofar as possible. The residence of a person is considered to be that place in which his habitation is fixed and to which, whenever he is absent, he has the intention of returning.

Source:

L. 33, Ex. Sess.:

p. 70, § 3.

CSA:

C. 143, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-10.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 446, § 2, effective May 26.

43-2-211. Cattle guards - specifications.

The board of county commissioners of a county has authority to establish cattle guards on highways at the expense of the county or to permit the owners of land adjoining a county highway to establish cattle guards on highways at the expense of the landowners. All such cattle guards shall be established according to fixed specifications and design and under the supervision of the board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 652, § 1.

CSA:

C. 143, § 154.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-11.

43-2-212. Sections applicable only to county highways.

The provisions of sections 43-2-211 to 43-2-213 shall apply to the establishment of cattle guards on highways designated as county highways.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 652, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 155.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-12.

43-2-213. Not deemed an obstruction.

Cattle guards permitted and established under the provisions of sections 43-2-211 and 43-2-212 shall not constitute an obstruction of the highway under the provisions of section 43-5-301.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 652, § 3.

CSA:

C. 143, § 156.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-13.

43-2-214. County highway anticipation warrant retirement fund.

Whenever the board of county commissioners of any county within the territorial limits of which there is or may be developed a producing oil or gas field deems it necessary to anticipate its road revenues in whole or in part for the construction, making, or repairing of public roads, bridges, or highway structures within the territorial limits of such county, it may by an order entered of record establish a fund under the administration of the county treasurer to be known as the county highway anticipation warrant retirement fund.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 749, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 157.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-14.

43-2-215. Moneys allocated to fund.

Upon creation and establishment of such fund the board of county commissioners of such county shall thereupon allocate to said fund all moneys which may become available to such county for highway purposes from federal royalties, together with such additional revenues as the board of county commissioners may determine to be necessary from the county road and bridge fund, not to exceed fifty percent thereof. Moneys and revenues allocated to said fund shall be held in said fund inviolate for the primary purpose of the retirement of all outstanding and unpaid county highway anticipation warrants issued in accordance with the provisions of sections 43-2-214 to 43-2-218.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 750, § 3.

CSA:

C. 143, § 158.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-15.

43-2-216. Warrants - sale - duration - interest.

When the board of county commissioners of such county has determined and approved, by resolution of the board, any highway project for the construction, repair, or improvement of highways within its territorial limits, either by the county itself or with the department of transportation of the state of Colorado and with or without federal aid so as to determine the cost thereof or the share of such cost to such county to be approved by such county, it may by resolution authorize the issuance of anticipation warrants in such amount as may be necessary to raise funds sufficient to defray costs of the same, said warrants thereupon to be delivered to the county treasurer and by him offered for public sale at not less than par. The aggregate of such warrants outstanding shall not exceed ten percent of the valuation for assessment of all property of said county as of the date of issuance thereof. No warrants shall run for a period longer than ten years before retirement nor bear a rate of interest in excess of four percent.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 750, § 4.

CSA:

C. 143, § 159.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-16.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1111, § 157, effective July 1.

43-2-217. County treasurer fiscal agent.

The county treasurer of such county shall be the fiscal agent of the county in connection with such highway anticipation warrants and shall administer said fund so as to retire such warrants therefrom at such times and in such manner as the board of county commissioners may prescribe in the issuance thereof, subject to the limitations provided in sections 43-2-214 to 43-2-218.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 750, § 5.

CSA:

C. 143, § 160.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-17.

43-2-218. Sections supplemental.

Sections 43-2-214 to 43-2-218 are supplemental and in addition to all other powers and authorities by statute or otherwise granted and enjoyed by the respective counties of the state.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 750, § 6.

CSA:

C. 143, § 161.

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-1-18.

43-2-219. County authority to privatize county highways and bridges - charge a toll.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the board of county commissioners of a county may enter public-private initiatives, as defined in section 43-1-1201 (3), for county highways and bridges on behalf of the county. In addition, the board of county commissioners of a county may enter into contracts or other agreements on behalf of the county to privatize any county highway or bridge or charge a toll therefor. The board may also charge a toll for any county highway or bridge for the purpose of constructing, operating, or maintaining such bridge or highway.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 447, § 10, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.